Mississippi statutes. Title 65. Highways, Bridges and Ferries
Article 5. Enforcement Agreements With Contiguous States.

§ 65-1-501.
Legislative intent.

It is the intent of the Legislature to promote and provide services economically and to streamline the process for the weighing of vehicles, the issuance of permits, the collections of taxes, fees, and assessments and for the enforcement of the laws of this state, and rules and regulations promulgated by the Mississippi Transportation Commission and the laws of the contiguous states and their appropriate agencies and departments, by authorizing the Mississippi Transportation Commission to enter into bilateral agreements with contiguous states through their appropriate officials, departments or agencies, to jointly locate, construct, staff and operate permanent and portable weight scales or ports of entry and for the enforcement of the laws of this state and the rules and regulations of the Mississippi Transportation Commission, and the laws of such contiguous states and its agencies and departments.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1998, ch. 426, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved March 23, 1998).

§ 65-1-503.
Authority to negotiate and enter into interstate agreements.

The Mississippi Transportation Commission may negotiate and enter into interstate agreements with contiguous states through their appropriate officials, departments or agencies, to jointly provide for the location, construction, staffing and operation of portable or permanent scales for the weighing of vehicles and trailers, for the issuance of permits, for the collection of fees, taxes, and assessments, and for the enforcement of the laws of this state and the rules and regulations of the Mississippi Transportation Commission, and the laws of such contiguous states and the rules and regulations of its appropriate agencies or departments.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1998, ch. 426, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved March 23, 1998).

§ 65-1-505.
Contents of agreements; collection and distribution of monies.

The interstate agreement may authorize employees of either state to weigh machinery, vehicles, trailers and other equipment under the jurisdiction of the Mississippi Transportation Commission, issue permits, collect fees, taxes, interests and penalties imposed by the laws, rules or regulations of either state or its agencies and departments, enforce the laws of either state and the rules and regulations of the Mississippi Transportation Commission and the appropriate agency or department of such contiguous state. All fees, taxes, assessments, interest and penalties imposed and collected for and on behalf of the State of Mississippi in a contiguous state or by any employee of a contiguous state pursuant to an interstate agreement entered into under Sections 65-1-501 through 65-1-513 shall be collected, paid and distributed to the Mississippi Transportation Commission or other appropriate agency of this state as otherwise provided by law for the collection, payment and distribution of such fees, taxes, assessments, interest and penalties in this state.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1998, ch. 426, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved March 23, 1998).

§ 65-1-507.
Enforcement employees; appointments; positions in other states or departments.

The Mississippi Transportation Commission may appoint employees of the contiguous states as duly authorized and empowered enforcement officers of the Mississippi Transportation Commission for the enforcement of tax, weight, size and load, equipment, safety and all other laws, rules and regulations of this state and the Mississippi Transportation Commission relating to vehicles entering into, exiting, or traveling upon the highways of this state, and may allow employees of the Mississippi Transportation Commission to accept similar positions or appointments with any contiguous state or the appropriate agency or department of such state and to enforce the rules, regulations and laws of such state or its agencies or departments.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1998, ch. 426, § 4, eff from and after passage (approved March 23, 1998).

§ 65-1-509.
Employees of contiguous states as employees of Mississippi; compensation and benefits; civil and criminal liability.

Any employee of a contiguous state which enters into an interstate agreement under the authority of Sections 65-1-501 through 65-1-513 shall not become an employee of this state or of the Mississippi Transportation Commission, and shall not be compensated by this state or be entitled to any employment benefits either directly or indirectly from this state or the Mississippi Transportation Commission. The State of Mississippi or the Mississippi Transportation Commission or its officers, agents or employees shall not be subject to civil or criminal liability for the actions or inactions of such person.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1998, ch. 426, § 5, eff from and after passage (approved March 23, 1998).

§ 65-1-511.
Employees of this state accepting employment with contiguous states; status; compensation.

Employees of this state who accept appointments from a contiguous state shall not, by virtue of their appointment, be considered an employee of that state, be compensated by that state or be considered an employee of that state for the purposes of employment rights.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1998, ch. 426, § 6, eff from and after passage (approved March 23, 1998).

§ 65-1-513.
Rules and regulations; authority to enact.

The Mississippi Transportation Commission may enact all rules and regulations necessary to implement the provisions of Sections 65-1-501 through 65-1-513 and the authority granted in Sections 65-1-501 through 65-1-513 shall be in addition to the powers granted to the Mississippi Transportation Commission by Section 65-1-8.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1998, ch. 426, § 7, eff from and after passage (approved March 23, 1998).